Utah statutes.
70A-9a-504.   Indication of collateral.
A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if
the financing statement provides:
(1)  a description of the collateral pursuant to Section 70A-9a-108; or
(2)  an indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all
personal property.
